Utah statutes.
62A-4a-206.1.   Foster parent's preference upon child's reentry into foster care.

When a child reenters the temporary custody or the custody of the division, and is to be placed in foster care, the child's former foster parents shall be notified.  Upon a determination of their willingness and ability to safely and appropriately care for the child, those foster parents shall be given a preference for placement of the child.

